Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.100

Salaries.

The chief administrative law judge shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor after recommendation of the director of financial management. Subject to any collective bargaining agreement, the salaries of administrative law judges appointed under the terms of this chapter shall be determined by the chief administrative law judge after recommendation of the director of financial management.

[ 2020 c 77 s 6; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 310; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 469; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3; 1986 c 155 s 10; 1981 c 67 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 77: See notes following RCW 41.80.410.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.